Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-4,157
Medical director; duties.

The medical director shall:

(1) Coordinate all clinical services;

(2) Participate in the selection and supervision of all clinical staff employed by or under contract with the department, including medical doctors, physician assistants, pharmacists, pharmacy technicians, registered nurses, licensed practical nurses, advanced practice registered nurses practicing under and in accordance with their respective certification acts, mental health practitioners, alcohol and drug counselors, laboratory technicians, physical therapists, optometrists, audiologists, dentists, dental assistants, and dental hygienists;

(3) Maintain and preserve the medical records of health care services;

(4) Approve the purchasing of all necessary medical supplies and medical equipment for the department;

(5) Recommend all necessary programs for the preservice, inservice, and continuing medical training and education of the health care staff and other relevant staff of the department, including training specifically designed to promote prompt and effective responses by all staff of the department to medical emergencies;

(6) Develop and implement condition-specific medical treatment protocols that ensure compatibility with a community standard of health care, including protocols addressing the: (a) Treatment of gastrointestinal bleeds; (b) detection and treatment of all communicable diseases; (c) treatment of gender-specific problems; (d) treatment of diabetes; (e) treatment of hypertension; (f) treatment of headaches; (g) utilization of surgical procedures; (h) control of infection; (i) provision of dental care; (j) provision of age-specific and gender-specific routine health maintenance; (k) means by which inmates obtain access to health care services; (l) use of prescribed drugs, devices, or biologicals for the purpose of pain management; (m) referral of patients to medical specialists not in the employ of the department; and (n) initiation, observance, and termination of do not resuscitate orders initiated pursuant to the Rights of the Terminally Ill Act;

(7) Develop and implement a system of general discharge planning for the health care services to be received by inmates who are soon to be released from the custody of the department and who have chronic health care problems, including establishment of a protocol to determine whether or not an inmate soon to be released should be prescribed and dispensed a medication-assisted treatment that could assist in reducing or eliminating the inmate’s use of opiates;

(8) Develop and implement a comprehensive health care services plan;

(9) Develop and implement an internal credentialing program for the employment and retention of the health care staff of the department based on a community standard of health care; and

(10) Develop and implement an internal peer review and quality assurance program based upon a community standard of health care.

Laws 2001, LB 154, § 5;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 142;

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 98;

Laws 2018, LB841, § 53.

Rights of the Terminally Ill Act, see section 20-401.